Indiana, session 2026, SB24.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-35 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS A
NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 35. HOOSIER CROSSROADS RETIREMENT
PROGRAM
Chapter 1. Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this
article.
Sec. 2. "Board" means the Hoosier crossroads retirement board
established by IC 5-35-2-1.
Sec. 3. "Employee" means an individual who:
(1) is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) is employed by an employer for at least ninety (90) days;
and
(3) earns wages subject to income taxation under IC 6-3.
Sec. 4. "Employer" means a person or entity engaged in a
for-profit or not-for-profit business, industry, profession, trade, or
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


other enterprise in Indiana, that:
(1) employed at least five (5) employees at any time during the
previous calendar year;
(2) has been in business for at least one (1) year; and
(3) has not offered, in the previous two (2) calendar years, a
qualified retirement plan to employees, including a plan
qualified under Section 401(a), 401(k), 403(a), 403(b), 408(k),
408(p), or 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 5. "Fee" means investment management charges,
administrative charges, investment advice charges, trading fees,
marketing and sales fees, revenue sharing, broker fees, and other
costs necessary to operate the program.
Sec. 6. "Internal Revenue Code" has the meaning set forth in
IC 6-3-1-11.
Sec. 7. "IRA" means a:
(1) Roth individual retirement account authorized under
Section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(2) traditional individual retirement account.
Sec. 8. "Program" means the Hoosier crossroads retirement
program developed under IC 5-35-3-1.
Sec. 9. "Program administrator" means an entity with which
the board contracts to administer the program.
Sec. 10. "Wages" means compensation (as defined in Section
219(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code) received by an employee
from an employer during the calendar year.
Chapter 2. Hoosier Crossroads Retirement Board
Sec. 1. (a) The Hoosier crossroads retirement board is
established within the office of the treasurer of state for the
purpose of establishing and implementing the Hoosier crossroads
retirement program. The board is a body corporate and politic and
is not a state agency. The board is an instrumentality of the state
exercising essential public functions.
(b) The board consists of the following nine (9) voting members:
(1) The treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's designee.
(2) The state comptroller or the state comptroller's designee.
(3) The following seven (7) members appointed by the
governor:
(A) Four (4) members of the public who have expertise in
investment or retirement savings plan administration,
including:
(i) the day to day operations of plans;
(ii) maintaining individual accounts;
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


(iii) investing assets in a retirement savings plan; and
(iv) individual financial planning.
Of the members appointed under this clause, at least one
(1) member must be a representative of a federally
chartered bank and at least one (1) member must be a
representative of a state chartered bank.
(B) One (1) member who is a representative of an
association representing employees.
(C) One (1) member who is a representative of small
businesses.
(D) One (1) member who is a representative of the interests
of program participants.
(c) The governor shall appoint board members as soon as
practicable.
(d) A board member appointed by the governor serves a term
of four (4) years that ends on June 30 of the second odd-numbered
year after the year the member's term begins.
Sec. 2. (a) The treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's
designee shall serve as chairperson of the board.
(b) The board shall elect from among its members any other
officers as may be necessary for the board to carry out its duties
and responsibilities.
Sec. 3. (a) The board shall meet at least four (4) times annually.
(b) The chairperson is authorized to call and set the agenda for
each board meeting.
(c) The board may conduct meetings remotely by teleconference
or videoconference. A member who attends a meeting by
teleconference or videoconference may vote on any measure.
Sec. 4. (a) Five (5) of the members of the board constitute a
quorum. A member's remote or in person attendance at a board
meeting counts toward the quorum determination.
(b) Each board member has one (1) vote.
(c) The board may take action consistent with its powers if:
(1) a quorum is present at a board meeting; and
(2) a majority of the members present at the meeting vote in
favor of the action.
Sec. 5. (a) The governor shall fill a vacancy on the board for a
member described in section 1(b)(3) of this chapter in the same
manner as the original appointment. The newly appointed member
serves the balance of the unexpired term.
(b) A vacancy on the board does not impair the right of a
quorum to exercise the powers and duties of the board.
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


Sec. 6. (a) Members of the board are not entitled to the
minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). Each
member is, however, entitled to reimbursement for mileage and
traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and other
expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's duties
as provided in the state policies and procedures established by the
Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency. Amounts paid under this section shall be paid from the
fund (as defined in IC 5-35-4-1).
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), members of the board
shall serve for the duration of the member's term and may be
reappointed.
(c) Members of the board appointed by the governor serve at
the pleasure of the governor. The governor may remove an
appointed member of the board for any of the following:
(1) Neglect of a duty required by law.
(2) Incompetence.
(3) Malfeasance.
(4) Unprofessional conduct.
(5) Conviction of an offense involving the misappropriation of
funds.
Sec. 7. (a) A board member, an individual serving as staff for
the board, and an agent appointed or engaged by the board shall
discharge their duties as fiduciaries with respect to the program
solely in the interest of the employee participants and beneficiaries
as follows:
(1) For the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to
employee participants and defraying reasonable expenses of
administering the program.
(2) By investing with the care, skill, prudence, and diligence
under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent
person acting in a like capacity and familiar with those
matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like
character and with like aims.
(3) By using any contributions paid by employees and
employers into the program exclusively for:
(A) the purpose of paying benefits to the employee
participants;
(B) the cost of administration of the program; and
(C) investments made for the benefit of the program.
(b) A board member, an individual serving as staff for the
board, and an agent appointed or engaged by the board shall not
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


engage in any activities that might result in a conflict of interest
with their duties.
Sec. 8. A board member, a program administrator, and any
other staff of the board shall not do any of the following:
(1) Directly or indirectly have a personal financial interest in
the making of any investment for the program, or in the gains
or profits accruing from any investment made for the
program.
(2) Borrow any funds or deposits in program accounts or the
fund (as defined in IC 5-35-4-1), or use those funds or deposits
in any manner, as an individual or as an agent or partner of
others.
(3) Become an endorser, surety, or obligor on investments
made under the program.
Sec. 9. (a) The board has the following powers and duties:
(1) Establish, implement, and maintain the program.
(2) Adopt rules for the general administration of the program.
(3) Direct the treasurer of state to hire staff to support the
oversight and administration of the program.
(4) Adopt an investment policy statement.
(5) Oversee the investment of the funds contributed to
accounts in the program consistent with the investment
restrictions established by the board.
(6) Collect application, account, or administrative fees to
defray the costs of administering the program.
(7) Explore and, as appropriate, establish incentives to
encourage participation in the program by eligible employers
and eligible employees. The incentives described in this
subdivision must include a grant program for:
(A) incentivizing compliance with the program; and
(B) defraying the costs of the program for small businesses.
(8) Seek and accept gifts, grants, and donations to be used for
the grant program established under subdivision (7) and for
the purposes of this article, unless the gifts, grants, or
donations would result in a conflict of interest relating to the
solicitation of vendors for program administration.
(9) Enter into a contract, agreement, or arrangement for any
of the following services considered necessary or desirable for
carrying out the purposes of this article:
(A) Services of private and public financial institutions,
depositories, consultants, investment advisers, investment
administrators, and third party program administrators.
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


(B) Research, technical, and other services.
(C) Services of other state agencies to assist the board in its
duties.
(10) Set fair and just penalties for employers that do not
comply with the requirements of the program and work with
the department of labor to enforce compliance with the
program.
(11) Evaluate the need for the program, program
administration, and board members to have private
insurance, and, if necessary, the procedures that must be
followed concerning private insurance.
(12) Develop and implement an outreach plan to gain input
and disseminate information regarding the program and
retirement savings in general.
(13) Assess the feasibility of multi-state or regional
agreements to administer the program through shared
administrative resources and enter into those agreements if
determined beneficial.
(14) Include financial education as a part of program
implementation to the extent feasible given available
resources.
(15) Make and enter into contracts, agreements, memoranda
of understanding, arrangements, partnerships, or other
arrangements to collaborate, cooperate, coordinate, contract,
or combine resources, investments, or administrative
functions with other governmental entities, including states,
state agencies, or instrumentalities of states that maintain or
are establishing retirement savings programs compatible with
the program. The board may, under the powers and duties
described by this subdivision, permit the collective, common,
or pooled investment of funds held in program accounts with
the funds of other states' programs:
(A) with which the assets of the program are permitted by
law to be collectively invested;
(B) to the extent necessary or desirable for the effective
and efficient design, administration, and implementation
of the program; and
(C) consistent with the purposes set forth in this article,
including the purpose of achieving economies of scale and
other efficiencies designed to minimize costs for the
program and employee participants.
(b) The investment restrictions described in subsection (a)(5)
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


must be consistent with the objectives of the program. The board
shall exercise the prevailing judgment and care that persons of
prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management
of that person's own affairs, with due regard to the probable
income and level of risk from certain types of investments of
money, in accordance with the policies established by the board.
Sec. 10. (a) The board may enter into intergovernmental
agreements with the secretary of state, the department of state
revenue, the department of labor, and any other agency that the
board deems appropriate to provide outreach, technical assistance,
or compliance services for the purposes of this article. An agency
that enters into an intergovernmental agreement with the board
under this section shall collaborate with the board to provide the
outreach, technical assistance, or compliance services to the board.
(b) The board shall coordinate with the efforts of other states as
those states pursue legal guidance for similar retirement savings
programs.
Sec. 11. The board shall design, establish, and operate the
program in a manner that:
(1) accords with best practices for retirement savings vehicles;
(2) maximizes participation, savings, and sound investment
practices;
(3) maximizes simplicity, including ease of administration for
participating employers and employees;
(4) provides an efficient product to employees by pooling
investment funds;
(5) ensures the portability of benefits; and
(6) provides for the decumulation of employee assets in a
manner that maximizes financial security in retirement.
Chapter 3. Retirement Program
Sec. 1. (a) The board shall develop an automatic enrollment
payroll deduction IRA known as the Hoosier crossroads retirement
program.
(b) The program is a defined contribution plan.
(c) The board shall adhere to the requirements under this
chapter in developing the program.
Sec. 2. The board shall design the program to promote greater
retirement savings for private sector employees in a convenient,
low cost, and portable manner. The program must do the
following:
(1) Automatically enroll a private sector employee who works
for an employer on the date the employee becomes eligible to
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


participate under section 6 of this chapter.
(2) Automatically enroll employees with a contribution level
of five percent (5%) of the employee's wages. Employees may:
(A) elect not to participate in the program; or
(B) select a different level of contribution.
(3) Pool investment money in the program to achieve cost
savings through efficiencies and economies of scale.
(4) Minimize total annual fees associated with the program.
(5) Ensure the portability of benefits and consider the type of
IRA offered as a way of increasing the portability of benefits.
(6) Ensure that employers in all Indiana industries are
covered by the program and that employees in all Indiana
industries can participate in the program.
(7) Provide for the investment and decumulation of employee
assets in a manner that maximizes financial security in
retirement.
(8) Allow employers that are not covered by the program to
voluntarily participate in the program.
(9) Allow individuals who are not considered employees under
the program but who meet the qualifications to open an IRA
to voluntarily participate in the program.
Sec. 3. (a) The board shall make or enter into contracts with not
more than three (3) investment managers, private financial
institutions, or other service providers to invest money and
administer the program in a manner consistent with the investment
policy statement adopted under IC 5-35-5-6.
(b) If fewer than three (3) entities:
(1) bid to be investment managers; or
(2) meet the qualifications to be an investment manager as
determined by the board;
the program may proceed with fewer than three (3) investment
managers.
Sec. 4. (a) For the first three (3) years of operation of the
program, total annual fees associated with the program may not
exceed one percent (1%) of the total value of the program's assets.
During this three (3) year period, the board shall conduct a study
to decide upon a fee rate that is fair to employers, employees, and
the state.
(b) In the fourth year of the operation of the program and in
each year thereafter, the board shall implement a total annual flat
fee rate from the study conducted under subsection (a). If the flat
fee rate is no longer efficient to the process of the program, the
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


board has the authority to readjust the flat fee rate at the
beginning of the board's next term.
Sec. 5. (a) The board shall establish as an investment option a
life cycle fund with a target date based upon the age of the
employee. Except as provided in subsection (d), unless the board
designates by rule a new investment option, the life cycle fund is
the default investment option for employees who do not elect an
investment option.
(b) The board may establish one (1) or more of the following
additional investment options:
(1) A conservative fund.
(2) A growth fund.
(3) A secure return fund.
(4) An annuity fund.
The board shall determine whether to establish any of the
additional investment options based upon an analysis of the cost,
risk profile, benefit level, feasibility, and ease of implementation of
the additional investment options.
(c) The primary objectives of a secure return fund established
under subsection (b) must be the preservation of the safety of
principal and the provision of a stable and low risk rate of return.
If the board elects to establish a secure return fund, the board may
procure any insurance, annuity, or other product to insure the
value of individual accounts. The cost of the insurance, annuity, or
other product must be paid out of the fund (as defined in
IC 5-35-4-1). Notwithstanding IC 5-35-2-7(a), if the board:
(1) elects to establish a secure return fund; and
(2) procures insurance, an annuity, or another product to
insure the value of individual accounts under this subsection;
the board, the program, the fund (as defined in IC 5-35-4-1), the
state, or a participating employer may not assume liability for
investment or actuarial risk under the policy or contract associated
with the insurance, annuity, or other product.
(d) If the board elects to establish a secure return fund under
subsection (b), the board shall determine whether the secure return
fund or life cycle fund will be the default investment option for
employees who do not elect an investment option. In making this
determination, the board shall consider the cost, risk profile,
benefit level, and ease of enrollment in the secure return fund. The
board may at any time thereafter revisit this determination and,
based upon an analysis of the criteria described in this subsection,
establish either the secure return fund or the life cycle fund as the
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


default investment option for employees who do not elect an
investment option.
Sec. 6. After December 31, 2027, an employee who:
(1) resides in Indiana; and
(2) is employed by an employer;
is eligible to participate in the program.
Sec. 7. An employer shall comply with all program requirements
under this article.
Sec. 8. An employee who participates in the program is fully
vested at all times in the employee's account under the program.
Sec. 9. (a) The state has no duty and is not liable to any party for
the payment of a retirement savings benefit accrued by an
individual under the program. Any financial liability for the
payment of retirement savings benefits in excess of money
available under the program is borne solely by the entities with
which the board contracts to provide insurance to protect the value
of the program.
(b) A state board, commission, agency, or an officer or employee
of a state board, commission, or agency is not liable for a loss or
deficiency resulting from particular investments selected under
this article.
(c) A participating employer is not liable for:
(1) an employee's decision to participate in or opt out of the
program; or
(2) the investment decisions of the board or of any employee
participants.
(d) A participating employer is not a fiduciary, or considered to
be a fiduciary, over the program. A participating employer does
not bear responsibility for the administration, investment, or
investment performance of the program.
(e) A participating employer is not liable for an error or
omission:
(1) on a disclosure form for the program;
(2) on the program website; or
(3) in information provided by the state concerning the
program.
(f) A participating employer is not liable with regard to:
(1) investment returns under the program;
(2) program design; or
(3) benefits paid to employee participants in the program.
Sec. 10. Money deposited by employee participants in the
program is not property of the state. The program is not a
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


department, institution, or agency of the state. An amount on
deposit in the program may not be commingled with state money.
The state has no claim to, claim against, or interest in money on
deposit in the program.
Sec. 11. (a) Before opening the program for enrollment, the
board shall design and disseminate to all employers an employer
information packet and an employee information packet, both of
which must include:
(1) background information on the program;
(2) appropriate disclosures for employees; and
(3) if necessary, information regarding the vendor website.
(b) The board shall establish and maintain a website designed
to make available to employers, employees, and members of the
general public the employee information packet, the employer
information packet, and any other reports, documents, or
information deemed appropriate by the board.
(c) The employee information packet designed by the board
must include a disclosure form. The disclosure form must explain
at least the following:
(1) The benefits and risks associated with making
contributions to the program.
(2) Instructions for making contributions to the program.
(3) Instructions for opting out of the program.
(4) Instructions for participating in the program with a level
of employee contributions other than the default rate.
(5) The process for withdrawing retirement savings in
accordance with the employee's investment type.
(6) How to obtain additional information about the program.
(7) That:
(A) an employee seeking financial advice should work with
the program administrator or contact a financial adviser;
(B) a participating employer is not in a position to provide
financial advice; and
(C) a participating employer is not liable for a decision an
employee makes in connection with the employee's
participation in the program.
(8) That the program is not an employer sponsored retirement
plan.
(9) That the program accounts and rate of return are not
guaranteed by the state.
(10) The possible tax implications of and restrictions on
individual retirement accounts.
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


Sec. 12. The board shall adopt rules that do the following:
(1) Allow employers that are exempt under this article to
voluntarily participate in the program.
(2) Extend eligibility to participate in the program to
individuals who are not employees, including unemployed
individuals, self-employed individuals, and other independent
contractors.
(3) Establish the process for enrollment in the program,
including procedures for the automatic enrollment of
employees and for employees to opt out of the program.
(4) Establish the process for withdrawal from program
accounts.
(5) Establish the process for participants to:
(A) make the default contribution of five percent (5%) to
program accounts; and
(B) adjust contribution levels, including a mechanism for
automatic adjustments of contribution levels.
(6) Establish the process for employers to:
(A) withhold employee contributions to program accounts
from employee wages; and
(B) send the contributions withheld under clause (A) to the
program administrator not later than fourteen (14) days
after the contributions are withheld from the employee's
wages.
(7) Establish the process for participants to make nonpayroll
contributions to program accounts.
(8) Set minimum and maximum contribution levels in
accordance with limits established by the Internal Revenue
Code.
(9) Establish the process and requirements for exempting an
employer from offering the program if the employer offers a
qualified retirement plan, including a plan qualified under
Section 401(a), 401(k), 403(a), 403(b), 408(k), 408(p), or 457(b)
of the Internal Revenue Code. The process for exemption
must:
(A) be minimal for an employer; and
(B) allow an employer to become exempt if the employer
enters into legally compliant multiple employer plans.
(10) Establish, in partnership with the department of labor,
the process for enforcing employer compliance with the
program.
(11) Establish fines for employer noncompliance for each
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


employee per year who is eligible to participate in the
program, not to exceed an aggregate amount of five thousand
dollars ($5,000) in a calendar year. The rules required by this
subdivision must include the following:
(A) If the board determines that an employer is not in
compliance with this article or rules adopted under this
article, the board shall issue a notice to the employer:
(i) outlining the nature and extent of the alleged
noncompliance;
(ii) providing instructions for compliance; and
(iii) specifying the potential administrative penalties for
noncompliance.
(B) The enforcement of fines may not commence until the
later of:
(i) one (1) year after the program is established; or
(ii) one (1) year after an employer is scheduled to enter
the program.
(C) An employer may be fined not earlier than three (3)
months after the employer has received a notice of
noncompliance under clause (A).
(12) Mandate the content and frequency of required
disclosures to employees, employers, and other program
participants. These disclosures must include the information
described in section 11(c) of this chapter.
(13) Establish the process and requirements for providing
grants to incentivize compliance with the program and defray
costs incurred by small businesses that participate in the
program.
Chapter 4. Hoosier Crossroads Retirement Fund
Sec. 1. For purposes of this chapter, "fund" means the Hoosier
crossroads retirement fund.
Sec. 2. (a) The Hoosier crossroads retirement fund is
established.
(b) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Money appropriated to the fund by the general assembly.
(2) Money transferred to the fund from the federal
government, other state agencies, or local governments.
(3) Money from the payment of:
(A) fees or penalties imposed under this article; or
(B) other money due to the board.
(4) Gifts, grants, or donations made to the board.
(5) Gifts, grants, donations, or investments concerning the
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


program received by the treasurer of state.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments must be deposited in the fund.
(d) Unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the
fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert to the state
general fund.
(e) Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the board
for the purposes of implementing and administering this article.
Chapter 5. Miscellaneous Provisions
Sec. 1. The treasurer of state may, for the costs associated with
the administration of this article, seek, accept, and expend from
private or public sources:
(1) gifts;
(2) grants;
(3) donations; or
(4) investments;
that are not required to be repaid.
Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c),
individual account information for accounts under the program,
including:
(1) names;
(2) addresses;
(3) telephone numbers;
(4) personal identification information;
(5) amounts contributed; and
(6) earnings on amounts contributed;
is confidential and must be maintained as confidential.
(b) Individual account information may be disclosed to the
extent necessary to administer the program in a manner consistent
with this article, IC 6, and the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) Subsection (a) does not apply if the individual who provides
the information or is the subject of the information expressly
agrees in writing that the information may be disclosed.
Sec. 3. (a) Not later than July 1 of each year, the board shall
submit to the:
(1) governor;
(2) state comptroller; and
(3) members of the:
(A) house committee on ways and means; and
(B) senate committee on appropriations;
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


a report detailing the board's activities and the status of the
program. The report to the members of the general assembly must
be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(b) The report must include at least the following:
(1) Statistics regarding enrollment in the program.
(2) The number of program accounts opened.
(3) The average amount employees are saving through the
program.
(4) Average contribution levels.
(5) A summary of common complaints or concerns about the
program.
(6) Information regarding the administrative costs and fees
associated with the program.
(c) The report must be made available on the program website
not later than January 1 following the date the report is submitted.
Sec. 4. (a) The board shall cause an accurate account of all
activities, operations, receipts, and expenditures to be maintained
in relation to the program and the board.
(b) Each year after the first full fiscal year following program
implementation, a full audit of the books and accounts of the board
pertaining to the activities, operations, receipts, expenditures,
personnel, services, and facilities of the program and the board
shall be conducted by a certified public accountant.
(c) The audit must include the review of direct and indirect costs
attributable to the use of outside consultants, independent
contractors, and any other persons who are not state employees for
the administration of the program.
(d) For purposes of the audit, the board shall allow the auditors
access to the properties and records of the program and board.
The auditors may prescribe methods of accounting and the
rendering of periodic reports in relation to projects undertaken by
the program.
Sec. 5. (a) Not later than twenty (20) days before the convening
of each regular session of the general assembly, the board shall do
the following:
(1) Prepare an annual report.
(2) Submit the annual report to:
(A) the governor; and
(B) the general assembly (in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6).
(3) Make the annual report available to the public.
(b) The annual report required in subsection (a) must include
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153


the following:
(1) An audited financial report prepared in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, detailing the
activities, operations, receipts, and expenditures of the
program and board during the preceding year.
(2) The progress and accomplishments made by the board
during the preceding year.
(3) Projected activities of the program for the upcoming year.
Sec. 6. (a) The board shall annually prepare and adopt a written
statement of investment policy that includes a risk management
and oversight program.
(b) The investment policy must prohibit the board, program,
and fund (as defined in IC 5-35-4-1) from borrowing for
investment purposes.
(c) The risk management and oversight program must be
designed to ensure that an effective risk management system is in
place to:
(1) monitor the risk levels of the program to ensure that the
risks taken are prudent and properly managed;
(2) provide an integrated process for overall risk
management; and
(3) assess investment returns and risk to determine if the risks
taken are adequately compensated compared to applicable
performance benchmarks and standards.
(d) The board shall hold a public hearing to consider the
statement of investment policy and any changes to the investment
policy.
SECTION 2. IC 34-30-2.1-51.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 51.5. IC 5-35-3-9 (Concerning the
Hoosier crossroads retirement program).
2026 IN 24—LS 6017/DI 153